Utah statutes.
72-4-205.   Ram Boulevard.

(1)  There is established Ram Boulevard comprising a section of Route 118 in Monroe from 1450 West along 100 South to Main Street.

(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as Ram Boulevard.



Enacted by Chapter 77, 2001 General Session

